Washington statutes.
RCW 43.110.080

Research and services to special purpose districts.

(1) The department of commerce shall contract for the provision of research and services to special purpose districts. A contract shall be made with a state agency, educational institution, or private consulting firm, that in the judgment of the department is qualified to provide such research and services.

(2) Research and services to special purpose districts shall consist of:

(a) Studying and researching issues relating to special purpose district government;

(b) Acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to special purpose districts; and

(c) Furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field services to special purpose districts concerning issues relating to special purpose district government.

(3) The department of commerce shall coordinate with the associations representing the various special purpose districts with respect to carrying out the activities in this section. Services to special purpose districts shall be based upon the moneys appropriated to the department of commerce from the special purpose district research services account under *RCW 43.110.090.

[ 2010 c 271 s 703; 2006 c 328 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.110.090 was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 8.

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.